web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.aff
SFX A Y 93
SFX A   a     a       a                  s.f.sg.art.
SFX A   a     o       a
SFX A   a     ei      [^s]a              s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   a     e       [^s]a              s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   a     ele     [^s]a              s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   a     elor    [^s]a              s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   a     ei      [^a]sa             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   a     e       [^a]sa             s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   a     ele     [^a]sa            s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   a     elor    [^a]sa            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   a     ei      [^e]asa           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   a     e       [^e]asa           s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   a     ele     [^e]asa          s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   a     elor    [^e]asa           s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   asa   sei     easa       s.f.sg.dat
SFX A   asa   se      easa       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   asa   sele    easa       s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   asa   selor   easa       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   0     a       [^i]e          s.f.sg.art.
SFX A   0     o       [^i]e
SFX A   0     a-i       [^i]e
SFX A   e     a       ie             s.f.sg.art.
SFX A   e     o       ie
SFX A   e     a-i       ie
SFX A   are   arii    [^oi]are       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   are   ari     [^oi]are       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   are   arile   [^oi]are      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   are   arilor  [^oi]are      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   are   erii    iare       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   are   eri     iare       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   are   erile   iare       s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   are   erilor  iare       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   oare     orii       oare        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   oare     ori      oare       s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   oare     oarele      oare       s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   oare     orilor    oare       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     ii      ere            s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     i       ere            s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ile     ere            s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor    ere            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     ii      are            s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     i       are            s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ile     are            s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor    are            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     ii      [iu]ne       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     i       [iu]ne       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ile     [iu]ne      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor    [iu]ne      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   0     i       [^e]ie      s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     i       ie           s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ile     [^e]ie      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor    [^e]ie      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     0       eie      s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     le      eie      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     lor     eie      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   ate   atii    ate       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   ate   ati     ate       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   ate   atile   ate       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   ate   atilor  ate       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   te   tii    [^a]te       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   te   ti     [^a]te       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   te   tile   [^a]te       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   te   tilor  [^a]te       s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   0     ua      a         s.f.sg.art.
SFX A   0     o      a
SFX A   0     lei     [^e]a        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   0     le      [^e]a        s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   0     lele    [^e]a        s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   0     lelor   [^e]a         s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   a     lei     ea          s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   a     le      ea          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   a     lele    ea          s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   a     lelor   ea          s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     eo   ime
SFX A   e     i   ime       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ii   ime       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     ile   ime      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor   ime     s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     i   lme       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ii   lme       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     ile   lme      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor   lme     s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   e     i   ce        s.f.pl.neart.
SFX A   e     ii   ce        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX A   e     ile   ce      s.f.pl.art.
SFX A   e     ilor   ce      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX A   0     i      ee   s.f.sg.dat
SFX A   0     le   ee   s.f.pl.art
SFX A   0     lor  ee   s.f.pl.dat
SFX A   0    i     te
SFX A   0    ii     te
SFX A   0    ile     te
SFX A   0    ilor     te
#end********************************************************************************


#********************************************************************************
# neutre: abajur/abajurui (C) sau sablon/sabloane (MP)
SFX C Y 15
SFX C 0 u  [^u]
SFX C 0 u-i  [^u]
SFX C 0 ul  [^u]            s.n. sg. art.
SFX C 0 uri  [^u]           s.n. pl. neart.
SFX C 0 urile  [^u]         s.n. pl. art.
SFX C 0 urilor  [^u]        s.n. pl. dat.
SFX C 0 ului  [^u]          s.n. sg. dat.
SFX C 0 ule  [^u]
SFX C 0 -i u
SFX C 0 l u                  s.n. sg. art.
SFX C 0 ri u                  s.n. pl. neart.
SFX C 0 rile u               s.n. pl. art.
SFX C 0 rilor u             s.n. pl. dat.
SFX C 0 lui u               s.n. sg. dat.
SFX C 0 le u

SFX c Y 9
SFX c 0 u  [^u]
SFX c 0 u-i  [^u]
SFX c 0 ul  [^u]            s.n. sg. art.
SFX c 0 ului  [^u]          s.n. sg. dat.
SFX c 0 ule  [^u]
SFX c 0 -i u
SFX c 0 l u                  s.n. sg. art.
SFX c 0 lui u               s.n. sg. dat.
SFX c 0 le u



SFX M Y 10
SFX M 0 u .
SFX M 0 ul .               s.n.sg.art.
SFX M 0 ului .             s.n.sg.dat.
SFX M 0 ule .
SFX M 0 e [^n]             s.n.pl.neart.
SFX M 0 ele [^n]           s.n.pl.art.
SFX M 0 elor [^n]          s.n.pl.dat.
SFX M on oane on            s.n.pl.neart.
SFX M on oanele on          s.n.pl.art.
SFX M on oanelor on         s.n.pl.dat.
