web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.dic
aclimatare/A
acord/C
acris/c
acvilon/c
adulta/A
advon/M
aeraj/c
aerodinam/C
afrikaans/c
agio/C
alambic/C
alanina/A
albinism/c
alfatron/M
alint/C
aliotman/c
aluminium/c
ambitie/A
amfiprostil/C
amino/c
amvon/M
analitism/c
androgeneza/A
anexionism/c
animal/M
anotimp/C
antialcoolism/c
antidogmatism/c
antifon/M
antiistorism/c
antipruriginoasa/A
antipsoriazis/c
antiumanism/c
antrax/C
antropomorfism/c
aposteriorism/c
apostrof/C
arabista/A
argentin/c
arhetip/C
ariston/M
aristotelism/c
artificialism/c
asemie/A
asfalt/C
atomism/c
audiofon/M
autarhie/A
autobrec/C
autofurgon/M
autovaccin/C
avalansa/A
aventurin/c
aviofon/M
avant/C
axion/M
bairam/C
balcon/M
bandoneon/M
bandou/C
banda/A
barbiturism/c
barbison/M
baron/M
bason/M
baston/M
batist/C
baton/M
benchi/C
berton/M
beton/M
biatlon/M
bicisnicie/A
bicorn/C
bidon/M
bilingvism/c
bilon/M
biociclu/C
bitumaj/C
bloc/C
bluzon/M
boaba/A
bocanit/C
bombament/c
bombon/M
bond/C
bot/C
breloc/C
breton/M
brichetaj/c
brodoada/A
bubon/M
bucle/C
bulon/M
bunceag/C
busc/C
bustrofedon/c
butelie/A
buton/M
cab/C
caboson/M
calc/C
calcicola/A
calemcheriu/c
campion/M
cancelling/c
canevas/C
canion/M
canton/M
capon/M
caprotina/A
carbid/c
carcinom/C
carcinotron/M
carnivor/c
casetofon/M
castron/M
catahris/C
catastrofala/A
cavalerism/c
cd/C
cement/C
cenobism/c
centenar/M
centon/M
cervicala/A
cestod/C
chalon/c
cheson/M
chibz/C
chichion/M
chipset/C
chiton/M
cian/c
ciclodrom/C
ciclotron/M
cifrata/A
ciomag/C
citochimism/c
ciur/C
clacheta/A
clenci/C
clistron/M
cloncanit/c
club-bar/C
cociorva/A
codicil/C
colargol/c
colon/M
colt/C
combinatie/A
combinezon/M
comision/M
comodat/c
comperaj/M
comput/C
concretionare/A
conservatism/c
consonanta/A
consult/C
contur/C
conturnare/A
cordon/M
corhart/c
corn/C
corsicana/A
cosmotron/M
cotilion/M
covercot/C
cosaveraj/M
creion/M
creton/M
criminal/C
criomagnetism/c
cristalizatiune/A
cronometraj/M
crupon/M
cruson/M
cubilou/C
cucon/M
cupoleta/A
cupon/M
curm/C
cvintilion/M
card/C
caprita/A
dada/c
daghereotip/C
decacord/C
decagon/M
decarburatie/A
decatron/M
decrescendo/c
definitie/A
degrade/C
demolare/A
derea/A
design/c
desistare/A
device/C
dezaxare/A
dictafon/M
didacticism/c
didactogenie/A
disolutiva/A
divizion/M
dobos/C
dolomit/c
dominion/M
donita/A
dragon/M
drumeag/C
durit/c
darmon/M
dainuita/A
edec/C
egalitarism/c
eleata/A
electrofon/M
elevon/M
emanationism/c
encomion/M
endoschelet/c
eneada/A
eneagon/M
epiplon/M
epiteliom/C
ergan/c
escadra/A
espadon/M
etimon/M
etnocentrism/c
evinsa/A
excitron/M
exomorfism/c
explozivitate/A
esantion/M
facturier/C
falconida/A
fanfaron/M
fanon/M
faringism/c
fason/M
feroaluminiu/c
fes/C
feston/M
fetala/A
fisc/c
flag/C
flegmon/M
flescaita/A
folclorism/c
fotomozaic/C
fractionism/c
fractionista/A
frison/M
fumarit/c
furajata/A
furgon/M
gablonz/C
galalit/c
galon/M
gazometrie/A
genetism/c
genotip/C
getter/c
ghidon/M
ghiold/C
gioarsa/A
giumbusluc/C
gnomon/M
gomenol/c
gostat/C
grafofon/M
gravida/A
guano/c
gujon/M
gulag/C
gaitanata/A
hamut/C
har/c
heliotropism/c
heliport/C
hemostaza/A
heptatlon/M
hidrociclon/M
hilozoism/c
hiperluciditate/A
hipotalamus/C
hitlerism/c
hotita/A
humerus/C
husitism/c
idiotip/C
idis/c
iezuita/A
ignitron/M
iluzionism/c
imprimerie/A
indeclinabila/A
indeterminism/c
ingerare/A
interactionare/A
intermezzo/C
internationalism/c
intumescenta/A
ipsofon/M
irenism/c
iteratie/A
jac/C
jainism/c
jargon/M
jug/C
juruita/A
jaratic/c
kalipatron/M
lamarckism/c
landsaft/C
laringofon/M
legitimitate/A
lemnarit/c
lenghi/C
lila/c
limnee/A
lipici/C
lonjeron/M
lotrit/c
lotionare/A
luping/C
lacarit/c
macmahon/M
magazionera/A
magniflex/c
mal/C
mamelon/M
manioc/c
marginalizata/A
maron/M
matrapazlac/C
mecanicism/c
mejdina/A
melofon/M
mendeleeviu/c
meplat/C
metalofon/M
metiloranj/c
miarta/A
microrelief/C
microtelefon/M
minicasetofon/M
minifotbal/c
minunare/A
miriapod/C
mitologism/c
modilion/M
molecula/A
monocristal/M
monofoto/c
monovers/C
morganism/c
motomitraliera/A
murg/C
murgit/c
muscheton/M
muzicalizare/A
naftalen/c
nare/A
nart/C
navifon/M
neastampar/c
necunostinta/A
nemiluita/A
neohegelianism/c
neprofesionism/c
neterminata/A
nimitez/C
nitragin/c
normanda/A
oberec/C
oblativitate/A
obscurantism/c
octatlon/M
oglingioara/A
olm/C
omegatron/M
omeomorfism/c
oratiune/A
oreion/M
orfism/c
ortotomus/C
osianism/c
otgon/M
ovalitate/A
palas/C
palisaj/c
palton/M
paos/c
papaveracee/A
parapod/C
parsism/c
partitionare/A
patron/M
pauperism/c
pasus/C
penibila/A
pentadecagon/M
perfectism/c
periplizon/M
perisip/C
persecutata/A
pertinax/c
pieptut/C
piparata/A
piramidon/M
pirometamorfism/c
pistonfon/M
plasmatron/M
platinit/C
plebeianism/c
pleuroscopie/A
plonjon/M
plurisemantism/c
pneu/C
poclon/M
policheta/A
polisintetism/c
pompon/M
poncho/C
populism/c
posmagita/A
potou/C
postalion/M
preclasicism/c
predicamentala/A
presa/A
prezidium/C
pripon/M
prizonierat/c
proclamativa/A
profont/C
pronomion/c
proteinograma/A
proxenetism/c
psihism/C
pufait/c
pulsativa/A
pumnal/M
paius/C
partasie/A
quattrocento/c
radiomicrofon/M
rafaelism/c
ralanti/C
rarefiata/A
readasta/A
reancolata/A
reatacare/A
rebizantinizare/A
recalata/A
rechizitor/c
recicatrizata/A
recompletare/A
recorlita/A
recul/C
redebarcare/A
redemistificare/A
redesertizata/A
redislocare/A
reejectare/A
reexperimentare/A
reflocosita/A
regenta/A
rehidratare/A
reinculcata/A
reistetita/A
relonista/A
remestecata/A
remulurare/A
renascocita/A
reparadosita/A
repiparare/A
reportofon/M
reprecuvantata/A
rereacoperita/A
rerezonare/A
reset/C
resosita/A
respiro/c
retransplantata/A
revajiita/A
reinclestare/A
reintraripata/A
ritidom/C
rodonit/c
rotatron/M
rotunjime/A
rucsac/C
ruteniu/c
rasfat/C
salep/C
saprofitism/c
satiabilitate/A
scheleton/M
schematism/C
scul/C
sebum/c
serasir/C
serializator/c
servobobina/A
sextilion/M
silfon/M
simun/C
sincrociclotron/M
sindicalism/c
smochinet/C
sorbitizare/A
sovietism/c
spicut/C
spion/M
stejaris/C
storax/c
strafund/C
subalimentare/A
sufit/C
supermaraton/M
suprastoc/C
surdomutism/c
samesoaie/A
taban/C
talveg/C
tampon/M
tapaj/c
taxofon/M
teledialog/C
telejurnal/M
telerecording/c
termofon/M
termoviziera/A
terpin/c
tetratlon/M
tibisir/C
tirbuson/M
toast/c
tondo/C
toron/M
transfer/c
transee/A
treieris/C
tribadism/c
tribunal/M
triod/C
trombon/M
troncon/c
tui/C
tamasag/C
tarcata/A
umlaut/c
uralit/c
urson/M
vacarm/C
varianta/A
vegetarianism/c
vers/C
vibrafon/M
videomagnetofon/M
vipt/C
virilism/c
voinicie/A
vraci/c
vagas/C
xilofon/M
yterbiu/c
zaratit/C
zeflemism/c
zigzaghare/A
zimbil/C
zvarcol/c
zaton/M
incordare/A
insuraciune/A
intregol/C
serlac/c
ses/C
soc/C
sodron/M
stift/C
stift/c
stiinta/A
telinis/C
tucal/M
